California statutes. Education Code
(2) Districts which, in the prior fiscal year, had less than 67 percent of their hours of credit instruction taught by full-time instructors shall apply up to 40 percent of their program improvement allocation as necessary to reach the 75 percent standard. If a district in this category chooses instead not to improve its percentage, the board of governors shall withhold 40 percent of the district’s program improvement allocation.

Districts which maintain 75 percent or more of their hours of credit instruction taught by full-time instructors shall otherwise be free to use their program improvement allocation for any of the purposes specified in Section 84755.

(b) The board of governors shall adopt regulations for the effective administration of this section. Unless and until amended by the board of governors, the regulations shall provide as follows:

(1) In computing the percentage of hours of credit instruction taught by full-time instructors, the hours of overload teaching by full-time instructors shall be excluded from both the total hours of credit instruction taught by full-time and part-time instructors and the total hours of instruction taught by full-time instructors.

(2) A full-time instructor shall be defined as any regular and contract faculty member teaching credit instruction.

(3) The chancellor shall compute and report to each community college district the number of full-time faculty (FTF) which are to be secured through the use of the prescribed portion of program improvement revenue allocated to each district. This computation shall be made by dividing the applicable portion of program improvement revenue (0 percent, 33 percent, or 40 percent of the program improvement allocation), by the statewide average “replacement cost” (a figure which represents the statewide average faculty salary plus benefits, minus the statewide average hourly rate of compensation for part-time instructors times the statewide average full-time teaching load). If the quotient is not a whole number, then the quotient shall be rounded down to the nearest whole number. If this quotient, once applied, will result in the district exceeding the 75 percent standard, the chancellor shall further reduce the quotient to a whole number that will leave the district as close as possible to, but in excess of, the 75 percent standard.

By March 15th of each year, the chancellor shall report to each district an estimate of the number of FTF to be secured based upon the appropriation of revenues contained in the annual Budget Bill.

(4) On or before December 31, 1991, the chancellor shall determine the extent to which each district, by September 30, 1991, has hired the number of FTF determined pursuant to paragraph (3) for the 1989–90 and 1990–91 fiscal years. To the extent that the cumulative number of FTF have not been retained, the chancellor shall reduce the district’s base budget for 1991–92 and subsequent fiscal years by an amount equivalent to the average replacement cost times the deficiency in the number of FTF.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.7.

(a) The board of governors shall, pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 70901, adopt regulations that establish minimum standards regarding the percentage of hours of credit instruction that shall be taught by full-time instructors.

(b) Upon notification by the board of governors, the Department of Finance shall transfer any money deducted from district apportionments pursuant to the regulations adopted under this section. This money shall be transferred to the Employment Opportunity Fund pursuant to Section 87107.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1169, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.8.

Whenever possible:

(a) Part-time faculty should be informed of assignments at least six weeks in advance.

(b) Part-time faculty should be paid for the first week of an assignment when class is canceled less than two weeks before the beginning of a semester. If a class meets more than once per week, part-time faculty should be paid for all classes that were scheduled for that week.

(c) The names of part-time faculty, once they are assigned to a course, should be listed in the schedule of classes rather than just described as “staff” or “faculty.”

(d) The names of part-time faculty, once they are assigned to a course, should be listed in the course schedule provided to students, faculty, and staff, rather than just described as “staff” or “faculty.”

(e) Part-time faculty should be considered to be an integral part of their departments and given all the rights normally afforded to full-time faculty in the areas of book selection, participation in department
 activities, and the use of college resources, including,
 but not limited to, telephones, copy machines, supplies, office space, mailboxes, clerical staff, library, and professional development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.   (AB 2834)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.9.

This section applies only to temporary and part-time faculty within the meaning of Section 87482.5. The issue of earning and retaining of annual reappointment rights shall be a mandatory subject of negotiation with respect to the collective bargaining process relating to any new or successor contract between community college districts and temporary or part-time faculty occurring on or after January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

87483.

Notwithstanding any other provision, the governing board of a community college district may establish regulations that allow academic employees to reduce their workload from full-time to part-time duties. The regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following if the employees wish to reduce their workload and maintain retirement benefits pursuant to Section 22713 of this code or Section 20900 of the Government Code:

(a) For employees subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program under the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan, the regulations shall include all requirements for participation in the reduced workload program pursuant to Section 22713.

(b) For employees subject to coverage under the Public Employees’ Retirement System: 

(1) The employee shall have reached the age of 55 prior to reduction in workload.

(2) The employee shall have been employed full time in an academic position or a position requiring certification qualifications, or both, for at least 10 years of which the immediately preceding five years were full-time employment.

(3) During the period immediately preceding a request for a reduction in workload, the employee shall have been employed full time in an academic position or a position requiring certification qualifications, or both, for a total of at least five years without
 a break in service. For purposes of this subdivision, sabbaticals and other approved leaves of absence shall not constitute a break in service. Time spent on a sabbatical or other approved leave of absence shall not be used in computing the five-year full-time service requirement prescribed by this subdivision.

(4) The option of part-time employment shall be exercised at the request of the employee and can be revoked only with the mutual consent of the employer and the employee.

(5) The minimum part-time employment shall be the equivalent of one-half of the number of days of service required by the employee’s contract of employment during his or her final year of service in a full-time position.

(6) The period of
 this part-time employment shall not exceed five years.

(7) The period of part-time employment shall not extend beyond the end of the college year during which the employee reaches his or her 70th birthday.

(c) (1) The employee shall be paid a salary that is the pro rata share of the salary he or she would be earning had he or she not elected to exercise the option of part-time employment but shall retain all other rights and benefits for which he or she makes the payments that would be required if he or she remained in full-time employment.

(2) The employee shall receive health benefits as provided in Section 53201 of the Government Code in the same manner as a full-time
 employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 30.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

87484.

(a) In the event a regular employee of a community college district has tenure as a full-time regular employee of the district, any assignment or employment of such employee in addition to his or her full-time regular assignment may be terminated by the governing board of the district at any time.

(b) Any assignment or employment of a contract employee in addition to his or her full-time assignment may be terminated by the governing board of the district at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

87485.

Except as provided in Section 87744, any contract or agreement, express or implied, made by any employee to waive the benefits of this chapter or any part thereof is null and void.

Notwithstanding provisions of this or any other section of this code, governing boards of community college districts may employ persons in academic positions on less than a full-time basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 85.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87486.

The governing board of any community college district may employ or engage as an independent contractor a suitably skilled person to serve as limited-term or part-time reader assistant in connection with instruction in composition and writing, and in mathematics, to faculty. Any person employed as a reader shall not be deemed to be employed in a faculty position, and, unless otherwise determined by the governing board, shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 88000) of Part 51 of this division. The governing board may pay hourly or unit compensation rates as it deems proper for the services rendered. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section not to authorize an increase in the number of students who may be assigned to any class, but to provide an opportunity for improvement in the quality of student writing and mathematics abilities through more frequent assignments of compositions and more work in mathematics made possible by the employment of suitably trained persons to assist the instructor in the careful marking and analysis of the students’ work. Furthermore, the means adopted for employing persons as reader assistants is not intended as an encroachment upon the merit system of public employment, but is adopted as the most practical arrangement, since most work of such nature will be done as part-time work and in the home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 86.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87487.

(a) The governing board of any community college district may establish a faculty internship program pursuant to regulations adopted by the board of governors and may employ, as faculty interns within the program, graduate students enrolled in the California State University, the University of California, or any other accredited institution of higher education, or, in vocational and technical fields where a master’s degree is not generally expected or available, persons who are within one year of meeting the regular faculty minimum qualifications. Persons who meet the regular faculty minimum qualifications, but who lack teaching experience, may also be included in internship programs authorized by this section to the extent authorized by the board of governors.

(b) A student employed as a faculty intern shall be employed as a temporary faculty member under Section 87482.5 and shall meet the minimum qualifications for faculty interns set by the board of governors. The board of governors shall adopt regulations to implement faculty intern programs, including requirements for mentoring of each intern.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 155.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87488.

Whenever the governing board of a community college district, by formal action, determines that because of impending curtailment of or changes in the manner of performing services, the best interests of the district would be served by encouraging the retirement of academic employees and that the retirement will result in a net savings to the district, an additional two years of service shall be credited under the Defined Benefit Program of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan to an academic employee pursuant to Section 22714 if all of the conditions set forth in that section are satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 313, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

87489.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Faculty employees” means full-time and temporary community college faculty members.

(2) “Employment certification form” means the form used by the United States Department of Education to certify an individual’s employment at a public service organization for the purposes of the Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program.

(3) “Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program” means the federal loan forgiveness program established pursuant to Section 685.219 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) (1) The chancellor’s office shall develop materials designed to increase awareness of the Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program, including at least all of the following:

(A) A one-page form letter, for use by community college districts to notify faculty employees who may be eligible for the Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program, that briefly summarizes the program, provides information on what an eligible faculty employee is required to do in order to participate, and recommends that the faculty employee contact the faculty employee’s loan servicer or servicers for additional information.

(B) A detailed fact sheet describing the Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program.

(C) A document containing answers to frequently asked questions about the Public Service Loan Forgiveness
 Program.

(2) The chancellor’s office shall provide the materials described in paragraph (1) to each community college district for distribution to faculty employees.

(c) (1) A community college district shall annually provide to all faculty employees the materials described in subdivision (b) in written or electronic form.

(2) In addition to the materials provided annually pursuant to paragraph (1), a community college district shall provide a newly hired faculty employee with those same materials within 30 days of the faculty employee’s first day of employment by mail, by electronic mail, or during an in-person new employee orientation.

(d) (1) A community college district shall annually provide a faculty
 employee who is enrolled in the Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program with notice of renewal and a copy of the employment certification form, with the employer portion of the form already completed.

(2) A community college district shall not unreasonably delay in completing the employer portion of the employment certification form.

(e) (1) For the purpose of qualifying for the Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program, a community college district shall, in completing the employer portion of the employment certification form, credit a faculty employee with at least 3.35 hours worked for each hour of lecture or classroom time. This paragraph does not supersede any higher adjustment factor established by a collective bargaining agreement or employer policy in recognition of the amount of out-of-class work that is associated with instruction, including, but not
 limited to, performance of office hours.

(2) A community college district shall, in completing the employer portion of the employment certification form, credit a faculty employee with noninstructional assignments hour for hour with no adjustment factor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 103.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employment of Faculty [87600. - 87612.]

87600.

The provisions of this article govern the employment of persons by a district to serve in faculty positions and establish certain rights for these employees. Other provisions of the law which govern the employment of community college faculty or establish rights and responsibilities for these persons shall be applied to persons employed by community college districts in a manner consistent with the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 90.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87601.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Academic year” means that period between the first day of a fall semester or quarter and the last day of the following spring semester or quarter, excluding any intersession term that has been excluded pursuant to an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(b) “Contract employee” means an employee of a district who is employed on the basis of a contract in accordance with Section 87605, subdivision (b) of Section 87608, or subdivision (b) of Section 87608.5.

(c) “District” means a community college district.

(d) “Positions requiring certification qualifications” are those positions which provide the services for which certifications have been established in this code.

(e) “Regular employee” means an employee of a district who is employed in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 87608, subdivision (c) of Section 87608.5, or Section 87609.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 85, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87602.

For the purposes of other provisions of law:

(a) A contract employee is a probationary employee.

(b) A regular or tenured employee is a permanent employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 36.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Sec. 70(e) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87603.

This article does not apply to the employment of administrators employed by appointment or contract pursuant to Section 72411.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87604.

The governing board of a community college district shall employ each academic employee as a contract employee, regular employee, or temporary employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 157.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87604.5.

(a) The governing board of a community college district shall, as part of the hiring process for an appointment to an academic, athletic, or administrative position with that district, do all of the following:

(1) (A) Require an applicant to disclose any final administrative decision or final judicial decision issued within the last seven years from the date of submission of the application determining that the applicant committed sexual harassment.

(B) Permit applicants to disclose if they have filed an appeal with the previous employer or, if applicable, with the United States Department of
 Education.

(2) Require an applicant to sign a release form that authorizes, in the event the applicant reaches the final stages of the application process, the release of information by the applicant’s previous employers to the community college district concerning any substantiated allegations of misconduct in order to permit the community college district to evaluate the released information with respect to the criteria for a potential job placement.

(3) If an applicant reaches the final stages of the application process for the intended academic, athletic, or administrative position, require the community college district to use the release form signed pursuant to paragraph (2) to engage in a reasonable attempt to obtain information from the previous employer
 concerning any substantiated allegations of misconduct.

(b) A community college district shall not ask an applicant to disclose, orally or in writing, information concerning any final administrative decision or final judicial decision described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), including any inquiry about an applicable decision on any employment application, until the community college district has determined that the applicant meets the minimum employment qualifications stated in the notice issued for the position.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a person who submits an employment application for an academic, athletic, or administrative position, but
 does not include a person who is a current employee and is hired or rehired for a different position with the same employer.

(2) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and the subsequent hearing.

(3) “Final judicial decision” means a final determination of a matter submitted to a court that is recorded in a judgment or order of that court.

(4) “Misconduct” means any violation of the policies governing employee conduct at the applicant’s previous place of employment, including, but not limited to, violations of policies prohibiting sexual harassment, sexual assault, or other forms
 of harassment or discrimination, as defined by the employer.

(5) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (a) of Section 66262.5 or, if applicable, as defined in Section 106.30 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(6) “Substantiated allegation” means an allegation that has been sustained based upon a burden of proof of at least a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 415, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 673, Sec. 4.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

87605.

The governing board of a district shall employ faculty for the first academic year of his or her employment by contract. Any person who, at the time an employment contract is offered to him or her by the district, is neither a tenured employee of the district nor a probationary employee then serving under a second or third contract entered into pursuant to Section 87608 shall be deemed to be employed for “the first academic year of his or her employment.” A faculty member shall be deemed to have completed his or her first contract year if he or she provides service for 75 percent of the first academic year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 38.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Sec. 70(e) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87606.

(a) An employment contract shall contain the terms and conditions that the governing board of the district and the proposed employee agree to and that are consistent with the law.

(b) A faculty member may be deemed to have completed the second, third, or fourth contract year, as appropriate, if the faculty member provides service for a percentage of the academic year as is required in an agreement between the governing board of the district and the exclusive bargaining representative
 of the faculty member. Time spent on paid or unpaid leave of absence may be included in computing service if the faculty member serves sufficient time during the year to allow for the evaluation of the faculty member as required by any negotiated evaluation procedure. For purposes of this subdivision, the paid or unpaid leave of absence may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Leave for reason of the birth of and bonding with a child or
 bonding with an adopted or foster child.

(2) Leave to care for a parent, spouse, or child with a serious health condition. 

(3) Leave because of an employee’s own serious health condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   (AB 675)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

87607.

Before making a decision relating to the continued employment of a contract employee, the following requirements shall be satisfied:

(a) The employee has been evaluated in accordance with the evaluation standards and procedures established in accordance with the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 87660) of this chapter, a fact determined solely by the governing board.

(b) The governing board has received statements of the most recent evaluations.

(c) The governing board has received recommendations of the superintendent of the district and, if the employee is employed at a community college, the recommendations of the president of that community college.

(d) The governing board has considered the statement of evaluation and the recommendations in a lawful meeting of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87608.

If a contract employee is working under his or her first contract, the governing board, at its discretion and not subject to judicial review except as expressly provided in Sections 87610.1 and 87611, shall elect one of the following alternatives:

(a) Not enter into a contract for the following academic year.

(b) Enter into a contract for the following academic year.

(c) Employ the contract employee as a regular employee for all subsequent academic years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 40.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Sec. 70(e) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87608.5.

If a contract employee is working under his or her second contract, the governing board, at its discretion and not subject to judicial review except as expressly provided in Sections 87610.1 and 87611, shall elect one of the following alternatives:

(a) Not enter into a contract for the following academic year.

(b) Enter into a contract for the following two academic years.

(c) Employ the contract employee as a regular employee for all subsequent academic years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 41.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Sec. 70(e) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87609.

If a contract employee is employed under his or her third consecutive contract entered into pursuant to Section 87608.5, the governing board shall elect one of the following alternatives:

(a) Employ the probationary employee as a tenured employee for all subsequent academic years.

(b) Not employ the probationary employee as a tenured employee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 43.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Sec. 70(e) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87610.

(a) The governing board shall give written notice of its decision under Section 87608 or 87608.5 and the reasons therefor to the employee on or before March 15 of the academic year covered by the existing contract. The notice shall be by registered or certified mail to the most recent address on file with the district personnel office. Failure to give the notice as required to a contract employee under his or her first or second contract shall be deemed an extension of the existing contract without change for the following academic year.

(b) The governing board shall give written notice of its decision under Section 87609 and the reasons therefor to the employee on or before March 15 of the last academic year covered by the existing contract. The notice shall be by registered or certified mail to the most recent address on file with the district personnel office. Failure to give the notice as required to a contract employee under his or her third consecutive contract shall be deemed a decision to employ him or her as a regular employee for all subsequent academic years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 45.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Sec. 70(e) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87610.1.

(a) In those districts where tenure evaluation procedures are collectively bargained pursuant to Section 3543 of the Government Code, the faculty’s exclusive representative shall consult with the academic senate prior to engaging in collective bargaining on these procedures.

(b) Allegations that the community college district, in a decision to grant tenure, made a negative decision that to a reasonable person was unreasonable, or violated, misinterpreted, or misapplied, any of its policies and procedures concerning the evaluation of probationary employees shall be classified and procedurally addressed as grievances. Allegations that the community college district in a decision to reappoint a probationary employee violated, misinterpreted, or misapplied any of its policies and procedures concerning the evaluation of probationary employees shall be classified and procedurally addressed as grievances. If there is no contractual grievance procedure resulting in arbitration, these allegations shall proceed to hearing in accordance with Section 87740.

“Arbitration,” as used in this section, refers to advisory arbitration, as well as final and binding arbitration.

(c) Any grievance brought pursuant to subdivision (b) may be filed by an employee on his or her behalf, or by the exclusive bargaining representative on behalf of an employee or a group of employees in accordance with Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The exclusive representative shall have no duty of fair representation with respect to taking any of these grievances to arbitration, and the employee shall be entitled to pursue a matter to arbitration with or without the representation by the exclusive representative. However, if a case proceeds to arbitration without representation by the exclusive representative, the resulting decision shall not be considered a precedent for purposes of interpreting tenure procedures and policies, or the collective bargaining agreement, but instead shall affect only the result in that particular case. When arbitrations are not initiated by the exclusive representative, the district shall require the employee submitting the grievance to file with the arbitrator or another appropriate party designated in the collective bargaining agreement, adequate security to pay the employee’s share of the cost of arbitration.

(d) The arbitrator shall be without power to grant tenure, except for failure to give notice on or before March 15 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 87610. The arbitrator may issue an appropriate make-whole remedy, which may include, but need not be limited to, backpay and benefits, reemployment in a probationary position, and reconsideration. Procedures for reconsideration of decisions not to grant tenure shall be agreed to by the governing board and the exclusive representative of faculty pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(e) Any employees who are primarily engaged in faculty or other bargaining unit duties, who perform “supervisory” or “management” duties incidental to their performance of primary professional duties shall not be deemed supervisory or managerial employees as those terms are defined in Section 3540.1 of the Government Code, because of those duties. These duties include, but are not limited to, serving on hiring, selection, promotion, evaluation, budget development, and affirmative action committees, and making effective recommendations in connection with these activities. These employees whose duties are substantially similar to those of their fellow bargaining unit members shall not be considered supervisory or management employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 124, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

87611.

A final decision reached following a grievance or hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 87610.1 shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 48.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Sec. 70(e) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87612.

Until terminated in accordance with provisions of law, a part-time regular employee shall be assigned, and compensated, for a period of service less than 75 percent of the number of days the colleges of the district are maintained during each academic year. The governing board of the employing district may establish an assignment for any period of days less than 75 percent.

At its discretion, the governing board of the employing district may assign and compensate a part-time regular employee for a period of service of 75 percent or more of the number of days the colleges of the district are maintained during each academic year. Such an assignment shall not change the employee’s classification to that of full-time regular employee unless an assignment of this type is made for two consecutive academic years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Community College Faculty [87620. - 87626.]

87620.

The provisions of this article apply to all persons employed as faculty members by a community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 105.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87622.

The employment, rights, responsibilities, dismissal, imposition of penalties for persons employed by a community college district in faculty positions shall be governed by Article 2 (commencing with Section 87600), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 87660). The employment of faculty by a community college district shall otherwise be governed as provided by law and in a manner consistent with Articles 2 and 4 and with this article (hereinafter referred to in this article, collectively, as “this act”).

This act shall take precedence, for the purposes of community college faculty, over any other act enacted by the Legislature at any session which, explicitly or implicitly, would result in community college faculty being governed by provisions inconsistent with this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 158.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87623.

(a) Each academic employee who is subject to accusations of misconduct is entitled to be provided with the general nature of the accusations made against the employee at least two business days before the employee is placed on involuntary paid administrative leave. At least two business days before the employee is placed on involuntary paid administrative leave, the employee shall be notified in writing of the general nature of the allegation or allegations of misconduct upon which the decision to place the employee on involuntary paid administrative leave is based.

(b) The requirements of subdivision (a) do not apply in the event of a serious risk of physical danger or other necessity
 arising from the specific allegations, and the employee may immediately be placed on involuntary paid administrative leave. The employee shall be provided with, at minimum, the general nature of the accusations made against the employee within five business days of the employee being placed on involuntary paid administrative leave.

(c) (1) Within 90 working days of placing an academic employee on involuntary paid administrative leave, the employer should complete its investigation of the accused misconduct and initiate disciplinary proceedings against, or reinstate, the employee, unless the period
 of paid administrative leave is extended by agreement of the employee and employer. The extension may not exceed 30 calendar days. The board of governors may, by regulation, establish a required amount of time in which an employer is expected to comply with this subdivision.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “working days” means Monday through Friday and does not include weekends and state holidays.

(d) For purposes of this section, “paid administrative leave” means a temporary leave from a job assignment, with pay and benefits intact.

(e) This section does not supersede the rights of labor organizations or employees pursuant to the Educational Employment Relations Act established in Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   (AB 1383)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

87626.

Rules and regulations adopted in relation to the evaluation process shall assure that the standards and procedures of the evaluation process in each district will be fair and in accordance with the intent of this act and that the evaluation processes of all of the districts are basically similar in substance and intent. These regulations shall permit and encourage a district governing board to establish evaluation procedures and standards which meet the particular needs of that district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Evaluations and Discipline [87660. - 87683.]

87660.

The provisions of this article govern the evaluation of, the dismissal of, and the imposition of penalties on, community college faculty. Other provisions of this code which govern the evaluation of, dismissal of, and the imposition of penalties on, community college faculty shall be applied to persons employed by a community college district in a manner consistent with the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 111.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87661.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Academic year” means that period between the first day of a fall semester or quarter and the last day of the following spring semester or quarter, excluding any intersession term that has been excluded pursuant to an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(b) “Contract employee” or “probationary employee” means an employee of a district who is employed on the basis of a contract in accordance with Section 87605, subdivision (b) of Section 87608, or subdivision (b) of Section 87608.5. 

(c) “District” means a community college district.

(d) “Regular employee” or “tenured employee” means an employee of a district who is employed in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 87608, subdivision (c) of Section 87608.5, or Section 87609.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 85, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87662.

Except as provided in Section 72411 and subdivision (i) of Section 87663, the provisions of this article do not apply to administrators employed pursuant to Section 72411.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 113.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87663.
